New York, session 2025-2026, A9027.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 168 of the public service law is amended by adding 2 a new subdivision 3-a to read as follows: 3 3-a. The board may not grant a certificate for the construction or 4 operation of an on-shore or off-shore industrial wind turbine or wind 5 farm within the jurisdiction and control of the state and within any 6 area of the state outside of the city of New York unless the board 7 simultaneously grants a certificate for the construction or operation of 8 an on-shore or off-shore industrial wind turbine or wind farm within 9 geographic boundaries of or the shoreline adjacent to the city of New 10 York. 11 § 2. Section 15-0503 of the environmental conservation law is amended 12 by adding a new subdivision 3-a to read as follows: 13 3-a. The department may not grant a permit for the construction or 14 operation of an on-shore or off-shore industrial wind turbine within the 15 jurisdiction and control of the state and within any area of the state 16 outside of the city of New York unless a certificate for the 17 construction or operation of an on-shore or off-shore industrial wind 18 turbine within geographic boundaries of or the shoreline adjacent to the 19 city of New York is issued pursuant to subdivision three-a of section 20 one hundred sixty-eight of the public service law. 21 § 3. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD08012-01-5